el: Φωνητικά εφέ: Ήχοι χειροκροτήματος/επευφημίας; Εφέ τύπου auto-tune; Chorus; Καθυστέρηση (Delay); Ηχώ; Βαθμολογία καραόκε; Τηλεβόας; Κανένα; Αλλαγή τόνου; Αντήχηση; Αλλαγή φωνής/ρομπότ; Άλλο
bg-BG: Гласови ефекти: Звуци на аплодисменти/овации; Ефект тип Auto-tune; Хорус; Забавяне; Ехо; Оценка за караоке; Мегафон; Няма; Промяна на височината на тона; Реверберация; Промяна на гласа/робот; Друго
sv: Rösteffekter: Applåd-/jubelljud; Auto-tune-effekt; Chorus; Delay; Eko; Karaokepoäng; Megafon; Ingen; Pitch-shift; Reverb; Röstförvrängare/robot; Övrigt
ru: Вокальные эффекты: Звуки аплодисментов/одобрения; Эффект автотюна; Хорус; Дилэй; Эхо; Оценка караоке; Мегафон; Нет; Изменение высоты тона (Pitch shift); Реверберация; Изменение голоса/робот; Другое
es: Efectos vocales: Sonidos de aplausos/ovaciones; Efecto estilo Auto-Tune; Coro; Retardo; Eco; Puntuación de karaoke; Megáfono; Ninguno; Cambio de tono; Reverberación; Cambiador de voz/robot; Otro
nl: Spraakeffecten: Applaus-/juichgeluiden; Auto-tune-stijleffect; Chorus; Delay; Echo; Karaokescore; Megafoon; Geen; Pitch-shift; Reverb; Stemvervormer/robot; Overige
zh-CN: 语音效果: 掌声/欢呼声; 自动调谐效果; 合唱; 延迟; 回声; 卡拉 OK 评分; 扩音器; 无; 变调; 混响; 变声器/机器人; 其他
sl-SI: Glasovni učinki: Zvoki aplavza/navijanja; Učinek v slogu funkcije Auto-Tune; Chorus; Zamik; Odmev; Točkovanje karaok; Megafon; Brez; Sprememba višine tona; Odmev (reverb); Sprememba glasu / robot; Drugo
ro-RO: Efecte vocale: Sunete de aplauze / aclamații; Efect tip auto-tune; Chorus; Delay; Ecou; Punctaj karaoke; Megafon; Fără; Modificare tonalitate (pitch shift); Reverb; Schimbător de voce / robot; Altele
pl: Efekty głosowe: Dźwięki braw/wiwatów; Efekt w stylu Auto-Tune; Chorus; Delay; Echo; Punktacja karaoke; Megafon; Brak; Zmiana tonacji (pitch shift); Pogłos (reverb); Zmieniacz głosu/robot; Inne
th: เอฟเฟ็กต์เสียง: เสียงปรบมือ/เสียงเชียร์; เอฟเฟกต์สไตล์ Auto-tune; คอรัส; ดีเลย์; เอคโค; การให้คะแนนคาราโอเกะ; โทรโข่ง; ไม่มี; ปรับระดับเสียง; รีเวิร์บ; เปลี่ยนเสียง/หุ่นยนต์; อื่นๆ
tr: Ses efektleri: Alkış/tezahürat sesleri; Auto-tune stili efekt; Koro; Gecikme; Yankı; Karaoke puanlama; Megafon; Yok; Ses perdesi kaydırma; Reverb; Ses değiştirici/robot; Diğer
zh-TW: 人聲效果: 鼓掌/歡呼聲; 自動調音風格效果; 和聲; 延遲; 回音; 卡拉 OK 評分; 大聲公; 無; 音高偏移; 殘響; 變聲器/機器人; 其他
de: Gesangseffekte: Applaus-/Jubelgeräusche; Auto-Tune-Effekt; Chorus; Delay; Echo; Karaoke-Bewertung; Megafon; Keine; Pitch-Shift; Reverb; Stimmenverzerrer/Roboter; Sonstiges
ja: ボイスエフェクト: 拍手 / 歓声; オートチューン風エフェクト; コーラス; ディレイ; エコー; カラオケ採点; メガホン; なし; ピッチシフト; リバーブ; ボイスチェンジャー / ロボット; その他
ko: 보컬 효과: 박수/환호 소리; 오토튠 스타일 효과; 코러스; 딜레이; 에코; 가라오케 채점; 메가폰; 없음; 피치 시프트; 리버브; 음성 변조/로봇; 기타
it: Effetti vocali: Suoni di applausi/tifo; Effetto stile auto-tune; Chorus; Delay; Eco; Punteggio karaoke; Megafono; Nessuno; Variazione di tonalità; Riverbero; Cambia voce/robot; Altro
sk-SK: Hlasové efekty: Zvuky potlesku/jasania; Efekt v štýle Auto-tune; Chorus; Delay; Echo; Hodnotenie karaoke; Megafón; Žiadne; Zmena výšky tónu; Reverb; Menič hlasu/robot; Iné
hr-HR: Glasovni efekti: Zvukovi pljeska/navijanja; Efekt u stilu Auto-Tunea; Chorus; Delay; Odjek; Bodovanje za karaoke; Megafon; Ništa; Pomak visine tona; Reverb; Mijenjanje glasa / robot; Ostalo
pt-PT: Efeitos de voz: Sons de aplausos/vivas; Efeito estilo Auto-Tune; Coro; Atraso; Eco; Pontuação de karaoke; Megafone; Nenhum; Mudança de tom; Reverberação; Modificador de voz/robô; Outro
fr: Effets vocaux: Applaudissements/acclamations; Effet de type Auto-Tune; Chorus; Délai; Écho; Notation karaoké; Mégaphone; Aucun; Modification de la hauteur tonale; Réverbération; Modificateur de voix/robot; Autre
cs: Hlasové efekty: Zvuky potlesku a jásotu; Efekt ve stylu Auto-Tune; Sbor; Zpoždění; Ozvěna; Bodování karaoke; Megafon; Žádné; Změna výšky tónu; Reverb; Měnič hlasu / robot; Jiné
vi: Hiệu ứng giọng nói: Tiếng vỗ tay/cổ vũ; Hiệu ứng chỉnh âm Auto-tune; Hợp xướng; Độ trễ; Tiếng vang; Chấm điểm karaoke; Loa phóng thanh; Không có; Thay đổi cao độ; Âm dội lại; Đổi giọng/người máy; Khác
hu: Hangeffektek: Taps/éljenzés hangok; Auto-tune stílusú effekt; Kórus; Késleltetés; Visszhang; Karaokepontozás; Megafon; Nincs; Hangmagasság-eltolás; Zengés; Hangtorzító/robot; Egyéb
nb: Stemmeeffekter: Applaus-/jubellyder; Auto-tune-effekt; Kor; Forsinkelse; Ekko; Karaokepoeng; Megafon; Ingen; Pitch shift; Klang; Stemmeveksler/robot; Annet
fi: Äänitehosteet: Aplodit/kannustusäänet; Auto-tune-tyylinen efekti; Kuoro; Viive; Kaiku; Karaokepisteytys; Megafoni; Ei mitään; Äänenkorkeuden muutos; Jälkikaiku; Äänenmuuntaja/robotti; Muu
en: Voice effects: Applause/cheer sounds; Auto-tune style effect; Chorus; Delay; Echo; Karaoke scoring; Megaphone; None; Pitch shift; Reverb; Voice changer/robot; Other
lt-LT: Balso efektai: Aplodismentų / džiaugsmo garsai; „Auto-tune“ stiliaus efektas; Choras; Uždelsimas („Delay“); Aidas; Karaokės vertinimas; Megafonas; Nėra; Tono keitimas; Reverb; Balso keitiklis / robotas; Kita
da: Stemmeeffekter: Bifalds-/jubellyde; Effekt i autotune-stil; Chorus; Forsinkelse; Ekko; Karaokepoint; Megafon; Ingen; Pitch shift; Rumklang; Stemmeændring/robot; Andet
pt-BR: Efeitos de voz: Sons de aplausos/vibração; Efeito estilo Auto-Tune; Coro; Delay; Eco; Pontuação de karaokê; Megafone; Nenhum; Pitch shift; Reverb; Modificador de voz/robô; Outros